New York, session 2025-2026, S3410.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1279-j to read as follows: 3 § 1279-j. Safety briefing of passengers plan; implementation on 4 Metro-North commuter railroad. The authority is hereby authorized and 5 directed to implement a safety briefing of passengers plan not later 6 than January first, two thousand twenty-seven, for the benefit of 7 persons utilizing transportation and other related services of the 8 Metro-North commuter railroad. Such program shall include, but not be 9 limited to, provisions for the following: 10 1. Before initial departure of each train carrying passengers, and 11 periodically thereafter, at the discretion of the authority at stations 12 where the greatest number of passengers board the train, the conductor, 13 or the conductor's designee, shall immediately communicate live and/or 14 by recorded, visual and/or audio images: 15 (a) Evacuation procedures; 16 (b) Location and means for opening the passenger entry doors and emer- 17 gency exits; 18 (c) Location of first aid and survival equipment; 19 (d) Location and operation of fire extinguishers. 20 In the event of a disaster or emergency, the conductor, or the conduc- 21 tor's designee shall communicate the safety briefing message as often as 22 necessary to ensure passenger safety. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05147-01-5 S. 3410 2 1 2. The briefings required by subdivision one of this section may be 2 delivered by means of an approved recording playback device that is 3 audible to each passenger under normal noise levels. 4 3. The training of conductors, train crew supervised by a conductor, 5 and other designated employees in emergency techniques and procedures, 6 interoperable communications, handling and positioning of stricken 7 commuters, and knowledge of procedures and equipment used during evacu- 8 ation procedures. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.